Idaho, session 2025, S1192.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Liquor Division the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from the
Liquor Control Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $57,400
Operating Expenditures $147,000
Capital Outlay $440,000
TOTAL $644,400
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.